Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2621.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known <--<--12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728 as The Administrative Code of 1929, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 2126.1. Pregnancy Risk Assessment Monitoring System.-- (a) The Pregnancy Risk Assessment Monitoring System SURVEY TO ASSESS MATERNAL AND INFANT OUTCOME MEASURES.--(A) THE PENNSYLVANIA MATERNAL AND INFANT OUTCOME MEASURES SURVEY PROGRAM is established in the Department of Health to promote collection, analysis and dissemination of population-based data for the purpose of improving maternal and child health in this Commonwealth. The program shall be administered by the Department of Health.(b) The Department of Health shall facilitate a survey of individuals who have recently experienced a live birth in this Commonwealth to gather data to evaluate preconception , PREGNANCY and postpartum behaviors, attitudes and experiences of individuals who recently experienced a live birth.(c) The Department of Health may use any funding available, including Federal appropriations, and may contract with third-party entities to fulfill the requirements FOR THE PURPOSES of this section.(d) The Department of Health may share data with researchers if the Department of Health maintains the confidentiality of personally identifiable information collected under this section. THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH MAY PUBLISH DE-IDENTIFIED SURVEY DATA AND USE DE-IDENTIFIED SURVEY DATA IN PUBLIC REPORTS AND MAY PERMIT THE USE OF DE-IDENTIFIED SURVEY DATA FOR RESEARCH PURPOSES.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2621PN3634 - 2 - <--<--<--<--<--12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728